Illinois, session 104th, SB3546.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Illinois Community College Board for the 7purpose of implementing the Community College Economic 8Empowerment Act. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102026.